Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.080

Investment in warrants on tax refund fund—Procedure upon purchase—Interest on.

Upon receipt of any such warrant on the tax refund fund the county treasurer shall enter the principal amount thereof, and accrued interest thereon, as a suspense credit upon his or her records, and shall hold the warrant until it with interest, if any, is paid in due course out of the county tax refund fund, and upon such payment, the amount thereof shall be restored to the county current expense fund. The refund warrants held by the county treasurer shall continue to draw interest until the payment thereof out of the county tax refund fund, which interest accruing subsequent to acquisition of the warrants by the county treasurer shall be paid into the county current expense fund.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4070; 1963 c 4 s 36.33.080. Prior: 1943 c 61 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5545-11.]